Wyoming statutes. Title 42 Welfare
Article 2. Medicaid Benefit Recovery

§ 42-4-201.
Action against third party; notice; subrogation.

If a person who is or becomes an applicant or recipient for medical assistance under this chapter receives an injury under circumstances creating a legal liability in some third party, the applicant or recipient shall not be deprived of any medical assistance for which he is entitled under this chapter. He may also pursue his remedy at law against the third party. If the applicant or recipient recovers from the third party in any manner, including judgment, compromise, settlement or release, the state is entitled to be reimbursed for all payments made, or to be made, on behalf of the applicant or recipient under this chapter.

The department shall be served by certified mail, return receipt requested, with a copy of the complaint within seven (7) days of its filing in any suit initiated pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. Any attorney who knowingly fails to serve the complaint on the department shall be reported to the state board of professional responsibility for the Wyoming state bar. The department shall be notified in writing by certified mail return receipt requested of any judgment, compromise, settlement or release entered into by any person who has been an applicant for or recipient of medical assistance under this chapter after the date of injury. If there is a settlement, compromise or release entered into by the parties the attorney general representing the director shall be made a party in all negotiations for settlement, compromise or release. The department, for purposes of facilitating compromise and settlement, may in a proper case authorize acceptance by the state of less than the state’s claim for reimbursement under this section for all current and future assistance under this chapter. Any reimbursement right created pursuant to this article shall remain in effect until the state is paid the amount authorized under this section. In addition the person paying the settlement remains liable to the state’s reimbursement right unless the state through the attorney general signs the release prior to payment of an agreed settlement.

If the injury causes death of the recipient, the rights and remedies in this section inure to, and the obligations are binding upon the personal representative of the deceased recipient for the benefit of his dependents.

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 39, § 2.

If, after notice is provided in accordance with this section, the department states in writing that it will neither file an independent action nor intervene in an existing action as allowed by W.S.

42-4-114

, the department’s reimbursement right shall be reduced by not more than thirty-three percent (33%) for attorney’s fees together with the amount of its proportionate share of costs. If the department does not provide this written statement, its right to reimbursement shall not be reduced by any share of the recipient’s attorney’s fees or costs.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 118, § 1; 1999, ch. 125, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 39, §§ 1, 2.

Notice of settlement. —

The statute applies only to recipients and, therefore, where an insurer settled a claim for benefits by an injured party before that injured party was approved for Medicaid benefits, the injured party's insurer was not obligated to notify the department of the settlement. State ex rel. Dep't of Health v. Dairyland Ins. Co., 11 P.3d 348,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 2000).

Reimbursement to Medicaid required. —

Although plaintiff was entitled to recover the amount paid on the sales contract based on breach where customized wheelchair did not meet required specifications, she was statutorily required to reimburse Medicaid for the payment made to the medical supply company on her behalf. Kirby v. NMC/ Continue Care, 993 P.2d 951,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 194

(Wyo. 1999).

Health department to be fully reimbursed when recovery received from third party. —

Wyoming legislature intended that department of health be fully reimbursed for Medicaid payments made on behalf of a recipient who recovers those payments from a liable third party. Cargill v. Department of Health, Div. of Health Care Fin., 967 P.2d 999,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1998).

Cited in

Adekale v. State, 2015 WY 30,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Feb. 26, 2015).

§ 42-4-202.
Third party liability; authority; enforcement; notice; costs.

When the department provides, pays for or becomes liable for medical care, it shall have a lien for the cost of the medical assistance provided upon any and all causes of action which accrue to the person to whom the care was furnished, or to the person’s legal representatives, as a result of the injuries which necessitated the medical care.

The department may perfect and enforce its lien by following the procedures set forth in W.S.

29-1-312

and

29-1-313

, and its verified lien statement shall be filed with the appropriate clerk in the county of financial responsibility. The verified lien statement shall contain the following:

The name and address of the person to whom medical care was furnished;

The date of injury;

The name and address of the vendor or vendors furnishing medical care;

The dates of the service;

The amount claimed to be due for the care;

To the best of the department’s knowledge, the names and addresses of all persons, firms or corporations claimed to be liable for damages arising from injuries.

This section shall not affect the priority of any attorney’s lien. The department shall not be subject to any limitations period referred to in title 1 or 29 of the Wyoming statutes to file its verified lien statement.

The department shall be given notice of monetary claims against a person, firm or corporation that may be liable to pay part or all of the cost of medical care when the department has paid or become liable for the cost of that care. Notice shall be given as follows:

Applicants for medical assistance shall notify the state or local agency of any possible claims when they submit the application. Recipients of medical assistance shall notify the department of any possible claims when those claims arise. A recipient’s noncooperation in providing information to the department to assist in pursuing liable third parties shall result in denial or termination of eligibility per federal law;

An enrolled medicaid provider shall notify the department when the person has reason to believe that a third party may be liable for payment of the cost of medical care. If the person providing medical care services fails to notify the department when a third party is liable for payment of the cost of medical care and the department, because of lack of notice from the provider, does not receive reimbursement for the cost of medical care, the department may adjust the value of those claims from future payments to that provider;

An attorney representing an applicant for or a recipient of medical assistance in a claim upon which the department may have a reimbursement right under this chapter shall notify the department of its potential claim for reimbursement before filing a claim, commencing an action, or negotiating a settlement. Any attorney who fails to notify the department of any settlement or fails to ensure the state is reimbursed, to the extent of its reimbursement right, from the proceeds of any settlement or judgment under this section shall be reported to the state board of professional responsibility for the Wyoming state bar. If the attorney knowingly failed to report and insure reimbursement to the state, the department shall have a claim for relief against the attorney for the amount of the reimbursement right under this chapter;

Insurers shall not disburse any settlement payment for a personal injury claim made to a recipient of medical assistance under this act until seven (7) working days after the department has received written notice from the insurer of the proposed settlement or judgment and failed to provide a written objection to the insurer. Failure to provide notice under this paragraph shall commence the tolling of any applicable statute of limitations.

Notice given to the local agency is not sufficient to meet the requirements of paragraphs (d)(ii) through (iv) of this section.

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 125, § 2.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 118, § 1; 1995, ch. 80, § 1; 1999, ch. 125, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 39, § 1; 2010, ch. 92, § 2.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “W.S.

29-1-312

and

29-1-313

” for “W.S.

29-1-301

and

29-1-302

” in the introductory language of (b).

Settlement before approval of benefits. —

The statute did not apply to an insurer which settled a claim for benefits by an injured party before that injured party was approved for Medicaid benefits. State ex rel. Dep't of Health v. Dairyland Ins. Co., 11 P.3d 348,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 2000).

Former subsection (f) of this section only applied when department of health exercised its option to file a lien statement

for reimbursement of Medicaid payments. Cargill v. Department of Health, Div. of Health Care Fin., 967 P.2d 999,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1998).

Health department not required to file and perfect lien for reimbursement. —

When she applied for Medicaid benefits, Medicaid recipient statutorily assigned to department of health her right to receive payment for medical care from a third party, and department was not required to file and perfect a lien in order to be entitled to reimbursement. Cargill v. Department of Health, Div. of Health Care Fin., 967 P.2d 999,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1998).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Dep't of Health v. Campbell, 950 P.2d 557,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1997).

§ 42-4-203.
Settlement between recipient and tortfeasor or insurer; lien not discharged; exceptions.

No settlement made by and between the applicant or recipient and the tortfeasor or insurer shall discharge the right to reimbursement created pursuant to this article, against any money due or owing by such tortfeasor or insurer to the applicant or recipient or relieve the tortfeasor or insurer from liability by reason of the right to reimbursement unless the settlement also provides for the payment and discharge of the right to reimbursement and the attorney general has signed a written release as provided by W.S. 42-4-201(b).

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 39, § 2.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 118, § 1; 1999, ch. 125, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 39, §§ 1, 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 42-4-204.
Department subrogated to right of recovery of applicant or recipient; utilization of personal health insurance; insurance coverage of recipients.

The department shall be subrogated to any right of recovery or indemnification arising from an accident or occurrence resulting in expenditures by the department, which an applicant or recipient of medical assistance or any legally liable party has against an insurer, health insurer, self-insured plan, group health plan, service benefit plan, managed care organization, pharmacy benefit manager or other party that is, by statute, contract or agreement, legally responsible for payment of a claim for health care items or services, including but not limited to hospitalization, pharmaceutical services, physician services, nursing services and other medical services, not to exceed the amount expended by the department for the care and treatment of the applicant or recipient. An applicant or recipient or legally liable party, by the act of applying for, or recipient receiving medical assistance, shall be deemed to have made a subrogation assignment and an assignment of claim for benefits to the department. The department shall inform an applicant of the assignments at the time of application. In addition, any entitlements from a contractual agreement with an applicant or recipient or legally liable party, a state or federal program or a claim or action against any responsible third party for medical services, not to exceed the amount expended by the department, shall be so assigned. The entitlements shall be directly reimbursable to the department by third party payors. The department may assign its right to subrogation or its entitlement to benefits to a designee or a health care provider participating in the medicaid program and providing services to an applicant or recipient, in order to assist the provider in obtaining payment for the services. A provider that has received an assignment from the department shall notify the insurer of the assignment upon rendering of services to the applicant or recipient. Failure to so notify the insurer shall render the provider ineligible for payment from the department. Once the insurer has been billed or notified the provider may not request payment through the medicaid program until a payment, denial or other explanation of benefits, not including mistakes in billing, is received from the insurer. The provider shall notify the department of any request by the applicant or recipient or his legally liable party or representative for billing information.

When a recipient of medical assistance has access to personal health insurance through his employer, payment or part payment of the premium for the insurance may be made by the department when deemed appropriate by the director of the department.

No individual accident policy, group accident policy, health policy, accident and health policy, medical expense policy or medical service plan contract, delivered, issued for delivery or renewed in this state on or after July 1, 1995, and no self-insured plan, managed care policy or plan, pharmacy benefit management plan or policy or other policy or plan issued by any other party that is, by statute, contract or agreement legally responsible for payment of a claim for items or services, delivered, issued for delivery or renewed in this state on or after July 1, 2007, shall contain any provision denying or limiting insurance benefits because services are rendered to an insured who is eligible for or who received medical assistance under this chapter. This section shall supersede any statutory provision to the contrary. No such policy, plan or contract, when enrolling an individual, shall take into account the individual’s eligibility for medical assistance under this chapter. This subsection applies to all such policies, plans and contracts issued by any person including, but not limited to:

An insurer;

A group health plan as defined in section 607(1) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974;

A managed care organization, pharmacy benefit manager or other party that is, by statute, contract or agreement, legally responsible for payment of a claim for a health care item or service;

An entity offering a service benefit plan;

A self-insured plan.

Medicaid shall not pay for any services provided under this chapter if the individual eligible for medical assistance has coverage for the services under an accident or health insurance policy or other source.

In addition to the separate requirements set forth in W.S.

42-4-205

, all health insurers, including all self-insured plans, group health plans as defined in section 607(1) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, service benefit plans, managed care organizations, pharmacy benefit managers, or other parties that are, by statute, contract, or agreement, legally responsible for payment of a claim for a health care item or service, shall agree, as a condition of doing business in the state of Wyoming, to:

Provide, with respect to the individuals who are eligible for or are provided medical assistance by the department of health, information to determine the period during which the individual or the individuals’ spouses or dependents may be or may have been covered by a health insurer and the nature of the coverage provided, including the name and address of the insurer and identifying number of the plan, in a manner prescribed by the secretary;

Accept the state’s right of recovery and the assignment to the state of any right of an individual or other entity to payment from another party for an item or service for which payment has been made under the state plan;

Respond to any inquiry by the state regarding a claim for payment for any health care item or service that is submitted not later than three (3) years after the date of the provision of such health care item or service; and

Agree not to deny a claim submitted by the state solely on the basis of the date of submission of the claim, the type or format of the claim form or a failure to present proper documentation at the point of sale that is the basis of the claim, if:

The claim is submitted by the state within the three (3) year period beginning on the date on which the item or service was furnished; and

Any action by the state to enforce its rights with respect to the claim is commenced within six (6) years of the state’s submission of the claim.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 118, § 1; 1995, ch. 18, § 2; 1995, ch. 80, § 1; 2007, ch. 149, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, rewrote section generally.

Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974. —

The Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, referred to in this section, is codified primarily as 29 U.S.C. § 1001 et seq.

Health department not required to file and perfect lien for reimbursement. —

When she applied for Medicaid benefits, Medicaid recipient statutorily assigned to department of health her right to receive payment for medical care from a third party, and department was not required to file and perfect a lien in order to be entitled to reimbursement. Cargill v. Department of Health, Div. of Health Care Fin., 967 P.2d 999,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1998).

Quoted

in

State ex rel. Department of Health v. Dairyland Ins. Co., 11 P.3d 348,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 42-4-205.
Insurance policy termination notification requirement.

With respect to cases for which there is an assignment in effect pursuant to W.S.

42-4-204

:

The department, upon receipt of the health coverage information, shall notify the obligor’s insuring entity that the department shall be notified thirty (30) days prior to discontinuance of coverage;

Entities providing health insurance as defined in title 26 and health maintenance organizations and prepaid health clinics as defined in W.S.

26-34-102

shall upon request by the department, provide a list of insureds residing in the state and any records and information as necessary to accomplish the purpose of this section, unless the requirement results in an unreasonable burden;

The department and the insurance commissioner appointed pursuant to W.S.

26-2-102

shall enter into a cooperative agreement for requesting and obtaining information necessary to effect the purpose and objectives of this section;

The department shall only request information from the entity providing health insurance necessary to determine whether health insurance, as defined pursuant to title 26 or those health services provided pursuant to W.S.

26-34-102

, are discontinued;

The department, in consultation with the department of insurance, shall promulgate rules for the development and administration of the cooperative agreement. The rules shall include the following:

A method for identifying those entities subject to furnishing information under the cooperative agreement;

A method for furnishing requested information; and

Procedures for requesting exemption from the cooperative agreement based on an unreasonable burden to the reporting entity.

If the department notifies the insurer that it has made payments to the provider, payment of benefits or notices of denial issued by the insurer shall be made directly to the department.

Upon the department receiving notice from the obligor’s insuring entity that the coverage is discontinued due to cancellation for any reasons, the department shall retain that information for use in enforcing any court order requiring the obligor to provide health insurance to the individuals stated in the court order.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 118, § 1; 1995, ch. 80, § 1.

§ 42-4-206.
Claims against estates.

If an individual receives any medical assistance pursuant to this chapter, upon the individual’s death, if single, or upon the death of the survivor of a married couple, either of whom received medical assistance, the total amount paid for medical assistance rendered for the individual or the spouse shall be filed by the department of health as a claim against the estate of the individual or the estate of the surviving spouse in the court having jurisdiction to probate the estate. A claim shall be filed if medical assistance was rendered for either person under one (1) of the following circumstances:

The person was fifty-five (55) years of age or older when he received medical assistance; or

The person was an inpatient in a nursing facility, intermediate care facility for people with intellectual disability or other medical institution when he received medical assistance.

The claim shall be considered an expense of the last illness of the decedent. Any statute of limitations which attempts to limit the department of health to recover for medical assistance provided pursuant to this chapter shall not apply to any claim made under this section for reimbursement for the medical assistance.

The claim shall include only the total amount of medical assistance rendered after the individual attains fifty-five (55) years of age or during a period of institutionalization as described in paragraph (a)(ii) of this section, and shall not include interest. A claim for medical assistance rendered for the predeceased spouse, against the estate of a surviving spouse who did not receive medical assistance, is limited to the value of the assets of the estate that were marital property or jointly owned property at any time during the marriage.

If a decedent who was single, or who was the surviving spouse of a married couple, is survived by a child who has not attained twenty-one (21) years of age or is blind or permanently and totally disabled as defined by 42 U.S.C. § 1382c, no claim shall be filed against the estate.

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 39, § 2.

The department of health shall establish procedures, in accordance with standards specified by the secretary of health and human services, under which the department of health shall waive the application of this section if application would work an undue hardship on the basis of criteria established by the secretary.

As used in this section:

“Asset” means as defined under W.S. 42-2-401(a)(i);

“Estate” shall include all real and personal property and other assets included within the individual’s estate, as defined for purposes of this state’s probate law, and includes any other real and personal property and other assets in which the individual had any legal title or interest at the time of death to the extent of that interest, including such assets conveyed to a survivor, heir or assign of the deceased individual through joint tenancy, tenancy in common, survivorship, life estate, living trust or other arrangement.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 73, § 1; 1995, ch. 80, § 1; 1999, ch. 125, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 39, § 2; 2008, ch. 70, § 1; 2016 ch. 20, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2019 ch. 15, §§ 1, 2, effective February 14, 2019.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “people with intellectual disability” for “the mentally retarded” in (a)(ii).

Laws 2008, ch. 70, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2008.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, inserted “of health” following “the department” in (a), (b) and (f); and substituted “department of health” for “department of family services” in (f).

The 2019 amendment,

in (g)(ii), inserted comma after "survivorship".

Laws 2019, ch. 15, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 14, 2019.

Legislative intent. —

Laws 1994, ch. 73, § 4, provides: “This act is intended to implement changes to the Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act required by the Federal Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1993. This act is intended to authorize changes to the state plan for medical assistance and services under chapter 4 of title 42, which are required or authorized by the provisions of the Federal Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1993, and which are in accordance with the provisions of this act. It is the intent of the legislature that the provisions of this act be interpreted in accordance with construction of that federal act and rules promulgated pursuant to that act.”

Ownership or control of assets. —

In a case
in which State filed a lien against two properties to recover the
cost of Medicaid benefits paid on behalf of a decedent, the evidence
indisputably showed that two quitclaim deeds were not delivered by
the decedent to her sons during her lifetime. The deeds were not effective
to reduce or eliminate the decedent's ownership or control of the
assets. Gheen v. State ex rel. Dep't of Health, 2014 WY 70, 326 P.3d 918,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2014), reh'g denied,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. July 1, 2014).

Validity of lien. —

Department of Health asserted a valid lien against a house owned by a deceased Medicaid recipient and the recipient's spouse as tenants by the entirety, upon the spouse's death, because a tenancy by the entirety was an “other arrangement” within the recipient's Medicaid recovery “estate,” under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 42-4-206(g)(ii), as, otherwise, Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 4-10-402(e) would be unnecessary. Estate of Marusich v. State ex rel. Dep't of Health, 2013 WY 150, 313 P.3d 1272,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 2013).

Authority to file lien. —

Department of Health had the authority to assert a lien against a house owned by a deceased Medicaid recipient and the recipient's spouse as tenants by the entirety, upon the spouse's death, because, even though the recipient's interest in the house passed to the spouse by operation of law upon the recipient's death, the recipient owned the interest at the time of the recipient's death, including the interest in the recipient's expanded Medicaid recovery “estate.” Estate of Marusich v. State ex rel. Dep't of Health, 2013 WY 150, 313 P.3d 1272,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 2013).

Equitable estoppel did not apply. —

Summary judgment was properly granted to the Wyoming Department of Health, Office of Medicaid, in an action seeking Medicaid reimbursement under this section because equitable estoppel did not apply; an employee did not engage in affirmative misconduct when incorrect advice was given, and the circumstances were not rare and unusual. Knori v. State ex rel. Dep't of Health, Office of Medicaid, 2005 WY 48, 109 P.3d 905,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 2005).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Dep't of Health v. Campbell, 950 P.2d 557,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1997).

§ 42-4-207.
Recovery of incorrect payments; recovery of correct payments; liens.

The department may through appropriate action recover any incorrect payment of medical assistance under this chapter on behalf of a recipient and may adjust any subsequent payment by an amount equal to the incorrect payment. Any recovery shall be prorated to the federal government in proportion to the amount it contributed for medical assistance rendered.

In addition to subsection (a) of this section and subject to a court order for recovery, the department may file a lien upon all real and personal property of the recipient for the incorrect payment of medical assistance on his behalf.

The department may file a pre-death lien upon real property of an individual for medical assistance correctly paid under this chapter to an individual:

Who is an inpatient in a nursing facility, intermediate care facility for people with intellectual disability, or other medical institution; and

With respect to whom the department determines, after notice and opportunity for a hearing, cannot reasonably be expected to be discharged from the medical institution and to return home.

No lien may be imposed under subsection (c) of this section on an individual’s home if any of the following persons are lawfully residing in the home:

The spouse of the individual;

The individual’s child who is under age twenty-one (21), or is blind or disabled as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1382c; or

A sibling of the individual, who has an equity interest in the home and who was residing in the home for a period of at least one (1) year immediately before the date of the individual’s admission to the medical institution.

No lien imposed under subsection (c) of this section shall be subject to recovery if any of the following persons are lawfully residing in the home on a continuous basis since the date of the individual’s admission to the facility or institution:

A sibling of the individual who was residing in the individual’s home for a period of at least one (1) year immediately before the date of the individual’s admission to the facility or institution;

A child of the individual who was residing in the individual’s home for a period of at least two (2) years immediately before the date of the individual’s admission to the facility or institution, and who establishes by a preponderance of the evidence that he provided care to the individual which permitted the individual to reside at home rather than in a facility or institution.

Any lien imposed with respect to an individual pursuant to subsection (c) of this section shall dissolve upon that individual’s discharge from the medical institution and return home.

Nothing in this section shall require an applicant for medical assistance under this chapter to enter into agreement for a lien upon his real and personal property for the payment of medical assistance on his behalf.

Upon sale of the property on which a lien has been imposed pursuant to subsection (c) or (j) of this section, the department shall seek recovery of the amount stated in its lien. Transfers of real or personal property on or after the look-back dates defined in 42 U.S.C. § 1396p by recipients of medical assistance under this chapter, or their spouses, without adequate consideration are voidable and may be set aside by an action in district court.

The department may file a lien against the property of any estate, as defined in W.S. 42-4-206(g), of a deceased recipient for the amount of medical assistance provided while the recipient was fifty-five (55) years of age or older or while the recipient was an inpatient in a nursing facility, intermediate care facility for people with intellectual disability or other medical institution. The department shall perfect this lien by filing a notice in the county in which the real property exists. The department may file an amended lien prior to the entry of the final order closing the estate.

The department may file a lien upon real property pursuant to W.S. 2-18-103(g) upon the death of the grantor. The department may file such lien regardless of whether the grantee applied for a certificate of clearance pursuant to W.S. 2-18-103(n) or filed an affidavit to establish the death of the grantor pursuant to W.S.

34-11-101

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 238, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 42-75; W.S. 1977, §

42-4-112

; Rev. W.S. 1977, §

42-4-109

; Laws 1988, ch. 34, § 2; 1994, ch. 73, §§ 2, 3; 1999, ch. 125, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 39, § 1; 2005, ch. 230, § 1; 2008, ch. 70, § 1; 2010, ch. 82, § 1; 2013 ch. 100, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2005 amendment

substituted “W.S. 42-4-206(g)” for “W.S. 42-4-206(h).”

Laws 2005, ch. 230, § 13, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2005.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “people with intellectual disability” for “the mentally retarded” in (c)(i) and (j).

Laws 2008, ch. 70, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2008.

The 2010 amendment,

in (c)(ii), deleted “of family services” following “whom the department.”

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (k).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed act.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 230, § 1, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

In a case
in which State filed a lien against two properties to recover the
cost of Medicaid benefits paid on behalf of a decedent, the evidence
indisputably showed that two quitclaim deeds were not delivered by
the decedent to her sons during her lifetime. The deeds were not effective
to reduce or eliminate the decedent's ownership or control of the
assets. Gheen v. State ex rel. Dep't of Health, 2014 WY 70, 326 P.3d 918,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2014), reh'g denied,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. July 1, 2014).

Department of Health asserted a valid lien against a house owned by a deceased Medicaid recipient and the recipient's spouse as tenants by the entirety, upon the spouse's death, because a tenancy by the entirety was an “other arrangement” within the recipient's Medicaid recovery “estate,” under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 42-4-206(g)(ii), as, otherwise, Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 4-10-402(e) would be unnecessary. Estate of Marusich v. State ex rel. Dep't of Health, 2013 WY 150, 313 P.3d 1272,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 2013).

Authority to file lien. —

Department of Health had the authority to assert a lien against a house owned by a deceased Medicaid recipient and the recipient's spouse as tenants by the entirety, upon the spouse's death, because, even though the recipient's interest in the house passed to the spouse by operation of law upon the recipient's death, the recipient owned the interest at the time of the recipient's death, including the interest in the recipient's expanded Medicaid recovery “estate.” Estate of Marusich v. State ex rel. Dep't of Health, 2013 WY 150, 313 P.3d 1272,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 2013).

Ownership or control of assets.

Validity of lien. —

Authority to file lien. —

Ownership or control of assets.

In a case
in which State filed a lien against two properties to recover the
cost of Medicaid benefits paid on behalf of a decedent, the evidence
indisputably showed that two quitclaim deeds were not delivered by
the decedent to her sons during her lifetime. The deeds were not effective
to reduce or eliminate the decedent's ownership or control of the
assets. Gheen v. State ex rel. Dep't of Health, 2014 WY 70, 326 P.3d 918,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2014), reh'g denied,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. July 1, 2014).

Validity of lien. —

Department of Health asserted a valid lien against a house owned by a deceased Medicaid recipient and the recipient's spouse as tenants by the entirety, upon the spouse's death, because a tenancy by the entirety was an “other arrangement” within the recipient's Medicaid recovery “estate,” under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 42-4-206(g)(ii), as, otherwise, Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 4-10-402(e) would be unnecessary. Estate of Marusich v. State ex rel. Dep't of Health, 2013 WY 150, 313 P.3d 1272,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 2013).

Authority to file lien. —

Department of Health had the authority to assert a lien against a house owned by a deceased Medicaid recipient and the recipient's spouse as tenants by the entirety, upon the spouse's death, because, even though the recipient's interest in the house passed to the spouse by operation of law upon the recipient's death, the recipient owned the interest at the time of the recipient's death, including the interest in the recipient's expanded Medicaid recovery “estate.” Estate of Marusich v. State ex rel. Dep't of Health, 2013 WY 150, 313 P.3d 1272,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 2013).

§ 42-4-208.
Recovery for cost of health care.

The department, to the extent necessary to reimburse its costs, shall be entitled to recover from any parent who:

Is required by court or administrative order to provide coverage of the cost of health services to a child eligible for medical assistance under this act [§§

42-4-101

through

42-4-208

]; and

Has received payment from a third party for the costs of such services but has not used the payments to reimburse either the other parent or guardian of the child or the provider of the services.

The department shall be entitled to enforce any judgment entered pursuant to this section by garnishment or any other available statutory remedy.

Claims for current and past due child support shall take priority over claims made under this section.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 18, § 1.

Cited in

Mt. Reg'l Servs. v. State ex rel. Dep't of Health, 2014 WY 69,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(May 29, 2014).